Nebraska, session 109, LB228.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 50-1203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1203 For purposes of the Legislative Performance Audit Act:
(1) Agency means any department, board, commission, or other
governmental unit of the State of Nebraska acting or purporting to act by
reason of connection with the State of Nebraska, including the Office of
Probation Administration and the Office of Public Guardian, but does not
include (a) any court, (b) the Governor or his or her personal staff, (c)
any political subdivision or entity thereof, or (d) any entity of the
federal government;
(2) Auditor of Public Accounts means the Auditor of Public Accounts
whose powers and duties are prescribed in section 84-304;
(3) Business day means a day on which state offices are open for
regular business;
(4) Committee means the Legislative Performance Audit Committee;
(5) Committee report means the report released by the committee at
the conclusion of a performance audit;
(6) Legislative Auditor means the Legislative Auditor appointed by
the Executive Board of the Legislative Council under section 50-401.01;
(7) Majority vote means a vote by the majority of the committee's
members;
(8) Office means the office of Legislative Audit;
(9) Performance audit means an objective and systematic examination
of evidence for the purpose of providing an independent assessment of the
performance of a government organization, program, activity, or function
in order to provide information to improve public accountability and
facilitate decisionmaking by parties with responsibility to oversee or
initiate corrective action. Performance audits may have a variety of
objectives, including the assessment of a program's effectiveness and
results, economy and efficiency, internal control, and compliance with
legal or other requirements;
-2-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
(10) Preaudit inquiry means an investigatory process during which
the office gathers and examines evidence to determine if a performance
audit topic has merit;
(11) Tax incentive performance audit means an evaluation of a tax
incentive program pursuant to section 50-1209; and
(12) Working papers means those documents containing evidence to
support the office's findings, opinions, conclusions, and judgments and
includes planning documents and the collection of evidence prepared or
obtained by the office during the performance audit or preaudit inquiry.
Sec. 2. Section 50-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1204 (1) The Legislative Performance Audit Committee is hereby
established as a special legislative committee to exercise the authority
and perform the duties provided for in the Legislative Performance Audit
Act. The committee shall be composed of the Speaker of the Legislature,
the chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, the
chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, and four
other members of the Legislature to be chosen by the Executive Board of
the Legislative Council. The executive board shall ensure that the
Legislative Performance Audit Committee includes adequate geographic
representation. The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the Legislative
Performance Audit Committee shall be elected by majority vote. For
purposes of tax incentive performance audits authorized in section
50-1209, the committee shall include as nonvoting members the chairperson
of the Revenue Committee of the Legislature or his or her designee and
one other member of the Revenue Committee, as selected by the Revenue
Committee. The Legislative Performance Audit Committee shall be subject
to all rules prescribed by the Legislature. The committee shall be
reconstituted at the beginning of each Legislature and shall meet as
needed.
(2) The Legislative Auditor shall ensure that performance audit work
-3-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
conducted by the office conforms with performance audit standards
contained in the Government Auditing Standards (2024 2018 Revision) as
required in section 50-1205.01. The office shall be composed of the
Legislative Auditor and other employees of the Legislature employed to
conduct performance audits. The office shall be the custodian of all
records generated by the committee or office except as provided by
section 50-1213, subsection (11) of section 77-2711, or subdivision (10)
(a) of section 77-27,119. The office shall inform the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst of its activities and consult with him or her as needed. The
office shall operate under the general direction of the committee.
Sec. 3. Section 50-1205.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1205.01 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, performance audits done under the terms of the Legislative
Performance Audit Act shall be conducted in accordance with the generally
accepted government auditing standards for performance audits contained
in the Government Auditing Standards (2024 2018 Revision), published by
the Comptroller General of the United States, Government Accountability
Office.
(2) Standards requiring continuing education for employees of the
office shall be met as practicable based on the availability of training
funds.
(3) The frequency of the required external quality control review
shall be determined by the committee.
(4) At the beginning of each biennial legislative session, the
Legislative Auditor shall create a plan for meeting such standards and
provide the plan to the chairperson of the Legislative Performance Audit
Committee.
Sec. 4. Section 50-1209, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
50-1209 (1) Tax incentive performance audits shall be conducted by
-4-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
the office pursuant to this section on the following tax incentive
programs:
(a) The Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act;
(b) The ImagiNE Nebraska Act;
(c) The Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act;
(d) The Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act;
(e) The Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act;
(f) The Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act;
(g) The New Markets Job Growth Investment Act;
(h) The Urban Redevelopment Act; and
(i) Any other tax incentive program created by the Legislature for
the purpose of recruitment or retention of businesses in Nebraska. In
determining whether a future tax incentive program is enacted for the
purpose of recruitment or retention of businesses, the office shall
consider legislative intent, including legislative statements of purpose
and goals, and may also consider whether the tax incentive program is
promoted as a business incentive by the Department of Economic
Development or other relevant state agency.
(2) The office shall develop a schedule for conducting tax incentive
performance audits and shall update the schedule annually. The schedule
shall ensure that each tax incentive program is reviewed at least once
every five years.
(3) Each tax incentive performance audit conducted by the office
pursuant to this section shall include the following:
(a) If applicable, an An analysis of whether the tax incentive
program is meeting the following goals:
(i) Strengthening the state's economy overall by:
(A) Attracting new business to the state;
(B) Expanding existing businesses;
(C) Increasing employment, particularly employment of full-time
workers. The analysis shall consider whether the job growth in those
-5-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
businesses receiving tax incentives is at least ten percent above
industry averages;
(D) Creating high-quality jobs; and
(E) Increasing business investment;
(ii) Revitalizing rural areas and other distressed areas of the
state;
(iii) Diversifying the state's economy and positioning Nebraska for
the future by stimulating entrepreneurial firms, high-tech firms, and
renewable energy firms; and
(iv) Any other program-specific goals found in the statutes for the
tax incentive program being evaluated;
(b) An analysis of the economic and fiscal impacts of the tax
incentive program. The analysis may take into account the following
considerations in addition to other relevant factors:
(i) The costs per full-time worker. When practical and applicable,
such costs shall be considered in at least the following two ways:
(A) By an estimation including the minimum investment required to
qualify for benefits; and
(B) By an estimation including all investment;
(ii) The extent to which the tax incentive changes business
behavior;
(iii) The results of the tax incentive for the economy of Nebraska
as a whole. This consideration includes both direct and indirect impacts
generally and any effects on other Nebraska businesses; and
(iv) A comparison to the results of other economic development
strategies with similar goals, other policies, or other incentives;
(c) An assessment of whether adequate protections are in place to
ensure the fiscal impact of the tax incentive does not increase
substantially beyond the state's expectations in future years;
(d) An assessment of the fiscal impact of the tax incentive on the
budgets of local governments, if applicable; and
-6-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
(e) Recommendations for any changes to statutes or rules and
regulations that would allow the tax incentive program to be more easily
evaluated in the future, including changes to data collection, reporting,
sharing of information, and clarification of goals.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Distressed area means an area of substantial unemployment as
determined by the Department of Labor pursuant to the Nebraska Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act;
(b) Full-time worker means an individual (i) who usually works
thirty-five hours per week or more, (ii) whose employment is reported to
the Department of Labor on two consecutive quarterly wage reports, and
(iii) who earns wages equal to or exceeding the state minimum wage;
(c) High-quality job means a job that:
(i) Averages at least thirty-five hours of employment per week;
(ii) Is reported to the Department of Labor on two consecutive
quarterly wage reports; and
(iii) Earns wages that are at least ten percent higher than the
statewide industry sector average and that equal or exceed:
(A) One hundred ten percent of the Nebraska average weekly wage if
the job is in a county with a population of less than one hundred
thousand inhabitants; or
(B) One hundred twenty percent of the Nebraska average weekly wage
if the job is in a county with a population of one hundred thousand
inhabitants or more;
(d) High-tech firm means a person or unitary group that has a
location with any of the following four-digit code designations under the
North American Industry Classification System as assigned by the
Department of Labor: 3341, 3342, 3344, 3345, 3364, 5112, 5182, 5191,
5413, 5415, or 5417;
(e) Nebraska average weekly wage means the most recent average
weekly wage paid by all employers in all counties in Nebraska as reported
-7-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
by the Department of Labor by October 1 of each year;
(f) New business means a person or unitary group participating in a
tax incentive program that did not pay income taxes or wages in the state
more than two years prior to submitting an application under the tax
incentive program. For any tax incentive program without an application
process, new business means a person or unitary group participating in
the program that did not pay income taxes or wages in the state more than
two years prior to the first day of the first tax year for which a tax
benefit was earned;
(g) Renewable energy firm means a person or unitary group that has a
location with any of the following six-digit code designations under the
North American Industry Classification System as assigned by the
Department of Labor: 111110, 111150, 111199, 111930, 111991, 113310,
221111, 221113, 221114, 221115, 221116, 221117, 221118, 221121, 221122,
221330, 237130, 237990, 325193, 331511, 331512, 331513, 331523, 331524,
331529, 332111, 332112, 333511, 333611, 333612, 333613, 334519, 423830,
482111, 484230, 488510, 541360, 541370, 541620, 541690, 541714, or
541715;
(h) Rural area means any village or city of the second class in this
state or any county in this state with fewer than twenty-five thousand
residents; and
(i) Unitary group has the same meaning as in section 77-2734.04.
Sec. 5. Section 50-1211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1211 (1) The committee shall review the office's report, the
agency's response, the Legislative Auditor's summary of the agency's
response, and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst's opinion prescribed in
section 50-1210. The committee may amend and shall adopt or reject each
recommendation in the report and indicate whether each recommendation can
be implemented by the agency within its current appropriation. The
adopted recommendations shall be incorporated into a committee report,
-8-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
which shall be approved by majority vote.
(2) The committee report shall include, but not be limited to, the
office's report, the agency's written response to the report, the
Legislative Auditor's summary of the agency response, the committee's
recommendations, and any opinions of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst
regarding whether the committee's recommendations can be implemented by
the agency within its current appropriation.
(3) The committee may decide, by majority vote, to defer adoption of
a committee report pending a public hearing. If the committee elects to
schedule a public hearing, it shall release, for review by interested
persons prior to the hearing, the office's report, the agency's response,
the Legislative Auditor's summary of the agency's response, and any
opinions of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The public hearing shall be
held not less than ten nor more than twenty business days following
release of the materials.
(4) When the committee elects to schedule a hearing, a summary of
the testimony received at the hearing shall be attached to the committee
report as an addendum. A transcript of the testimony received at the
hearing shall be on file with the committee and available for public
inspection. Unless the committee votes to delay release of the committee
report, the report shall be released within forty business days after the
public hearing.
(5) Once the committee has approved its report, the committee shall,
by majority vote, cause the committee report to be released to all
members of the Legislature and to the public. The report submitted to the
members of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The
committee may, by majority vote, release the committee report or portions
thereof prior to public release of the report. Each tax incentive
performance audit report may shall also be presented at a joint hearing
of the Appropriations Committee and Revenue Committee of the Legislature.
Sec. 6. Section 50-1213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-9-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
amended to read:
50-1213 (1) The office shall have access to any and all information
and records, confidential or otherwise, of any agency, in whatever form
they may be, including, but not limited to, direct access to all agency
databases containing relevant program information or data, unless the
office is denied such access by federal law or explicitly named and
denied such access by state law. If such a law exists, the agency shall
provide the committee with a written explanation of its inability to
produce such information and records and, after reasonable accommodations
are made, shall grant the office access to all information and records or
portions thereof that can legally be reviewed. Accommodations that may be
negotiated between the agency and the committee include, but are not
limited to, a requirement that specified information or records be
reviewed on agency premises and a requirement that specified working
papers be securely stored on agency premises.
(2) Upon receipt of a written request by the office for access to
any information or records, the agency shall provide to the office as
soon as is practicable and without delay, but not more than three
business days after actual receipt of the request, either (a) the
requested materials or (b)(i) if there is a legal basis for refusal to
comply with the request, a written denial of the request together with
the information specified in subsection (1) of this section or (ii) if
the entire request cannot with reasonable good faith efforts be fulfilled
within three business days after actual receipt of the request due to the
significant difficulty or the extensiveness of the request, a written
explanation, including the earliest practicable date for fulfilling the
request, and an opportunity for the office to modify or prioritize the
items within the request. No delay due to the significant difficulty or
the extensiveness of a request for access to information or records shall
exceed three calendar weeks after actual receipt of such request by any
agency. The three business days shall be computed by excluding the day
-10-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
the request is received, after which the designated period of time begins
to run. Business day does not include a Saturday, a Sunday, or a day
during which the offices of the custodian of the public records are
closed.
(3) Except as provided in this section, any confidential information
or confidential records shared with the office shall remain confidential
and shall not be shared by an employee of the office with any person who
is not an employee of the office, including any member of the committee.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (11) of section 77-2711 and
subdivision (10)(d) of section 77-27,119, if any employee or former
employee of the office knowingly divulges or makes known, in any manner
not permitted by law, confidential information or confidential records,
he or she shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and, in the case of
an employee, shall be dismissed.
(5) No proceeding of the committee or opinion or expression of any
member of the committee or office employee acting at the direction of the
committee shall be reviewable in any court. No member of the committee or
office employee acting at the direction of the committee shall be
required to testify or produce evidence in any judicial or administrative
proceeding concerning matters relating to the work of the office except
in a proceeding brought to enforce the Legislative Performance Audit Act.
(6) Pursuant to sections 84-712 and 84-712.01 and subdivision (5) of
section 84-712.05, the working papers obtained or produced by the
committee or office and correspondence between the office and an audited
agency shall not be considered public records. The committee may make the
working papers available for purposes of an external quality control
review as required by generally accepted government auditing standards.
However, any reports made from such external quality control review shall
not make public any information which would be considered confidential
when in the possession of the office.
Sec. 7. Original sections 50-1203, 50-1204, 50-1205.01, 50-1211,
-11-

LB228 LB228
2025 2025
and 50-1213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 50-1209,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-12-